dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="dra/ge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gende</l>     <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ød/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sv/erge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>erga</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erga</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erga</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erga</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ergede</l>    <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ergede</l>    <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ergende</l>   <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ergete</l>    <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ergete</l>    <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erget</l>     <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erget</l>     <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oren</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oret</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oret</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orne</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orne</l>      <r>erge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sv/erje__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>erja</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erja</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erja</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erja</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erjede</l>    <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erjede</l>    <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erjende</l>   <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erjete</l>    <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erjete</l>    <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erjet</l>     <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erjet</l>     <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oren</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oret</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oret</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orne</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orne</l>      <r>erje<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="knep/pe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>pede</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pede</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pete</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pete</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="redebon__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/yge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>øyen</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyet</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øyne</l>      <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ygende</l>    <r>yge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="avsverge">        <i>avsv</i><par n="sv/erge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsverge">       <i>forsv</i><par n="sv/erge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="besverge">        <i>besv</i><par n="sv/erge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drage">           <i>dra</i><par n="dra/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avsverje">        <i>avsv</i><par n="sv/erje__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsverje">       <i>forsv</i><par n="sv/erje__adj"/></e>
<e lm="besverje">        <i>besv</i><par n="sv/erje__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sverge">          <i>sv</i><par n="sv/erge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sverje">          <i>sv</i><par n="sv/erje__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kneppe">          <i>knep</i><par n="knep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lyge">            <i>l</i><par n="l/yge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sammensverje">    <i>sammensv</i><par n="sv/erje__adj"/></e>
<e lm="redebon">         <i>redebon</i><par n="redebon__adj"/></e>
<e lm="øde">             <i>ød</i><par n="ød/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sammensverge">    <i>sammensv</i><par n="sv/erge__adj"/></e>
